Louisiana, session 2026, HB414.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:587.1.2(A)(2)(a)(i) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§587.1.2. Provision of information to protect children who receive services at a
therapeutic group home
A.
* * *
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
(2)(a) The persons to which this Section applies include:
(i) Any person who owns, operates, or manages a licensed therapeutic group
home individual who has any ownership interest in a therapeutic group home or who
has managerial authority over its business operations or its provision of client care.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1203.1(6) and 1203.2(A), (B), (C)(1), and (E)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1203.2(H) and (I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART II. CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECKS ON
NONLICENSED PERSONS AND LICENSED
AMBULANCE PERSONNEL
§1203.1. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed
in this Section:
* * *
(6) "Nonlicensed person" means any person who provides for compensation
nursing care or other health-related services directly related to patient care to
residents in or patients of a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for people with
developmental disabilities, adult residential care facility or provider, pediatric day
health care facility, adult day health care center, psychiatric residential treatment
facility, end stage renal disease facility, behavioral health services provider, home
health agency, hospice agency, provider of ambulance services, hospital, adult brain
injury facility, crisis receiving center, pain management clinic, outpatient abortion
facility, rural health clinic, ambulatory surgical center, therapeutic group home,
forensic supervised transitional residential and aftercare facility, case management
provider, or home- and community-based service provider an employer and who is
not a licensed health provider. "Nonlicensed person" also means any person who
provides such services to individuals in their own homes as an employee or contract
provider of a home health agency, hospice, or home- and community-based service
provider. "Nonlicensed person" also means any other direct service worker as
defined in R.S. 40:2179 and 2179.1. "Nonlicensed person" also means a student or
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
trainee applying for enrollment in a clinical preceptor training program authorized
by R.S. 40:1201.1 et seq., or in a nurse aide training program approved by the
department pursuant to federal and state law or regulation. "Nonlicensed person"
does not include a person who, while acting within the course and scope of the
person's employment, does not provide direct care or other health-related services
to a person, including but not limited to cafeteria workers, maintenance and janitorial
staff, and groundskeepers.
* * *
§1203.2. Employment of nonlicensed persons and licensed ambulance personnel;
training program enrollment of nonlicensed persons; mandatory criminal
history and security checks; temporary employment; notice to applicants
A.(1) Except as otherwise provided in Subsection C of this Section, prior to
any employer making an offer to employ or to contract with a nonlicensed person or
any licensed ambulance personnel to provide nursing care, health-related services,
medic services, or supportive assistance to any individual, the employer shall request
that a criminal history and security check be conducted on the nonlicensed person
or any licensed ambulance personnel pursuant to the provisions of this Section. If
the employer is a facility, home, or institution which is part of a larger complex of
buildings, the requirement of a criminal history and security check shall apply only
to an offer of employment or contract made to a nonlicensed person or any licensed
ambulance personnel who will work primarily in the immediate boundaries of the
facility, home, or institution.
(2) Except as otherwise specified in Paragraph (D)(1) of this Section, an
employer may obtain the criminal history record maintained by the office of state
police of a nonlicensed person or any licensed ambulance personnel offering to
provide nursing care, health-related services, or supportive services to any
individual.
B.(1)(a) The Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, an
employer shall request in writing that the office or authorized agency conduct a
criminal history and security check on the nonlicensed person or any licensed
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
ambulance personnel and shall provide the office or authorized agency with any
relevant information required by the office or authorized agency to conduct the
check. The employer may request that the criminal history and security check be
performed using the fingerprints of the nonlicensed person or any licensed
ambulance personnel.
(2) (b) An employer or authorized agency shall pay a fee of twenty-six
dollars to the office for a search of the office's criminal history files on an applicant
for employment.
(3) (c) The security check shall consist of the use of personal identifiers,
such as name, social security number, date of birth, and driver's license number, to
search the national sex offender public registry. An authorized agency shall notify
the office if a security check reveals that an applicant is listed in the national sex
offender public registry.
(2) A hospital, as defined in R.S. 40:2102, shall conduct a criminal history
and security check in one of the following ways:
(a) Following the procedure described in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(b) Obtaining a criminal history and security check prepared by a consumer
reporting agency as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f) that also meets all of the following
criteria:
(i) The consumer reporting agency is accredited by the Professional
Background Screening Association or a successor organization maintaining
nationally recognized accreditation standards for employment background screening
agencies.
(ii) The criminal history and security check includes a search of the criminal
court records in each parish or county in which the applicant has resided during the
preceding three years, federal criminal court records, and the national sex offender
public registry.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
(iii) The consumer reporting agency searches records using multiple personal
identifiers including but not limited to name, date of birth, and address history.
(iv) The consumer reporting agency prepares the criminal history and
security check report in compliance with the requirements of 15 U.S.C. 1681.
C.(1)(a) An employer may make an offer of temporary employment to a
nonlicensed person or any licensed ambulance personnel pending the results of the
criminal history and security check on the person. In such instances, the employer
shall provide to the office or authorized agency the name and relevant information
relating to the person within seventy-two hours after the date the person accepts
temporary employment.
(b) The existence of a pending arrest record, unresolved record match,
misdemeanor traffic offense, parking violation, or other nonviolent misdemeanor
offense not enumerated in R.S. 40:1203.3(A) shall not, by itself, prohibit temporary
or conditional employment of a nonlicensed healthcare worker pending final
completion of the criminal history review.
* * *
E.(1) An employer shall inform each applicant for employment or each
prospective contract provider that the employer is required to obtain a criminal
history record and perform a security check before such employer makes an offer of
employment to, or contracts with, a nonlicensed person or any licensed ambulance
personnel. The employer shall obtain written permission from the applicant for the
release of such information to the employer on a form that clearly notifies the
applicant it is a crime to provide false information concerning a criminal history
check to an employer.
* * *
H. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an employer may
permit a nonlicensed person to begin conditional employment while awaiting final
disposition or clarification of a criminal history check when all of the following
conditions are met:
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
(1) The preliminary criminal history review does not reveal a conviction for
an offense enumerated in R.S. 40:1203.3(A).
(2) Any unresolved record match involves only:
(a) Traffic-related offenses.
(b) Parking violations.
(c) Administrative citations.
(d) Nonviolent misdemeanor offenses not involving abuse, neglect,
exploitation, theft, fraud, controlled dangerous substances, or crimes against a
person.
(e) Identity verification issues requiring additional review by state police or
other reporting agency.
(3) The employee works under supervision consistent with existing
temporary employment requirements provided in Subsection C of this Section.
(4) The employer immediately removes the employee from direct service
duties upon receipt of a final criminal history report revealing a disqualifying
offense.
I. An employer shall maintain documentation demonstrating compliance
with the requirements of this Section in accordance with R.S. 40:1203.4.
Section 3. R.S. 40:1203.3(A)(1), (C), and (D)(1) and 2008.10(A)(1)(a)(i) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1203.3(A)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1203.3. Refusal to hire or contract; termination of employment; exceptions to
hiring prohibition; appeal procedure; waiver
A. Except as otherwise provided in R.S. 40:1203.2(C) and Subsection E of
this Section, no employer shall hire any licensed ambulance personnel or nonlicensed
person when the results of a criminal history and security check reveal that the
licensed ambulance personnel or nonlicensed person has been convicted of any of
the following offenses:
(1) R.S. 14:28.1, 30, 30.1, 31, 32.6, 32.7, 32.12, 34, 34.1, 34.7, 35.2, 37,
37.1, 37.4, 38.1, 42, 42.1, 43, 43.1, 43.2, 43.3, 43.5, 44, 44.1, 44.2, 46.2, 51, 60, 64,
64.1, 64.4, 66, 67.16, 80, 81.2, 89, 89.1, 93, 93.3, 93.4, 93.5, 283.3 or distribution or
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
possession with the intent to distribute controlled dangerous substances as listed in
Schedules I through V of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
* * *
(5) An offense that occurred in another state or a federal offense that is
substantially similar to an offense provided for in Paragraphs (1) through (4) of this
Subsection.
C. If the results of a criminal history and security check reveal that a
nonlicensed person or any licensed ambulance personnel hired on a temporary basis
or any other person who is an employee has been convicted of any of the offenses
listed in Subsection A or B of this Section or has been convicted of a crime in
another state or federal court that is substantially similar to an offense listed in
Subsection A of this Section, the employer shall immediately terminate the person's
employment.
D.(1) The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a nonlicensed person
or licensed ambulance personnel who was working under a waiver granted under the
law in effect prior to August 15, 2010, so long as if that person continues to be
employed for the employer who granted the waiver and the person began
employment for the employer prior to August 15, 2010, or a person who has received
a pardon of the conviction or has had his conviction expunged.
* * *
§2008.10. Therapeutic group homes licensed by the Louisiana Department of
Health; state central registry of child abuse and neglect; criminal background
checks
A.(1)(a) The provisions of this Section shall apply to the following persons:
(i) Any person who owns, operates, or manages a licensed therapeutic group
home individual who has any ownership interest in a therapeutic group home or who
has managerial authority over its business operations or its provision of client care.
* * *
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 414 ENROLLED
Section 4. R.S. 40:1203.1(4)(g) and (5) and 1203.3(B) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
Section 5.(A) This Section and Section 2 of this Act shall become effective upon
signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor.
(B) Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this Act shall become effective on October 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.